Washington statutes.
RCW 11.28.280

Successor personal representative.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 11.28.270, if a personal representative of an estate dies or resigns or the letters are revoked before the settlement of the estate, letters testamentary or letters of administration of the estate remaining unadministered shall be granted to those to whom the letters would have been granted if the original letters had not been obtained, or the person obtaining them had renounced administration, and the successor personal representative shall perform like duties and incur like liabilities as the preceding personal representative, unless the decedent provided otherwise in a duly probated will or unless the court orders otherwise. A succeeding personal representative may petition for nonintervention powers under chapter 11.68 RCW.

[ 1997 c 252 s 6; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 26; 1965 c 145 s 11.28.280. Prior: 1955 c 205 s 8; 1917 c 156 s 77; RRS s 1447; prior: Code 1881 s 1428.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.